LEXC/morphology.lexc
LEXICON Morphology
Prefixes ;
@U.PREFIX.NONE@ Stems ;

LEXICON Prefixes
@U.PREFIX.pang@:@U.PREFIX.pang@pang Stems ;
@U.PREFIX.nag@:@U.PREFIX.nag@nag    Stems ;

LEXICON Stems
hatag   Tags ;

LEXICON Tags
@U.PREFIX.pang@+Purp:@U.PREFIX.pang@    # ;
@U.PREFIX.nag@+V:@U.PREFIX.nag@         # ;
@U.PREFIX.NONE@ # ;



!!LEXICON Morphology
!!Prefixes ;
!!Stems ;
!!
!!LEXICON Prefixes
!!@P.PREFIX.pang@:@P.PREFIX.pang@pang Stems ;
!!
!!LEXICON Stems
!!hatag   Tags ;
!!
!!LEXICON Tags
!!@R.PREFIX.pang@+Purp:@R.PREFIX.pang@    # ;
!!@D.PREFIX.pang@ # ;
